District of Columbia statutes.
11-1724

Auditor-Master.

There shall be an Auditor-Master of the Superior Court who shall (1) execute orders of reference referred by the Superior Court and perform duties in connection with the execution of such orders in accordance with Rule 53 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable rule, and (2) perform such other functions as may be assigned by the Superior Court.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 5(a)
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(87), 108 Stat. 713
Oct. 18, 2004, 118 Stat. 1345, Pub. L. 108-335, § 329
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2027, Pub. L. 109-356, § 116(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1724.
1973 Ed., § 11-1724.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. L. 108-335 deleted the second and third sentences in the section which had read as follows: “The Auditor-Master shall give bond faithfully to discharge the duties of that office. The bond shall have two or more sureties to be approved by the chief judge of the Superior Court, and shall be in an amount prescribed by the chief judge.”
Pub. L. 109-356 made a technical correction to Pub. L. 108-335 that did not change the text of the section.

Effective Dates

Section 116(c) of Pub. L. 109-356 provided that the amendments made by this section shall take effect as if included in the enactment of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2005 [Pub. L. 108-335].